Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-2129
Bonds; actions; effect.

In any suit, action, or proceedings involving the validity or enforceability of any bond of an authority or the security therefor, any such bond reciting in substance that it has been issued by the authority to aid in financing a redevelopment project, as herein defined, shall be conclusively deemed to have been issued for such purpose and such project shall be conclusively deemed to have been planned, located, and carried out in accordance with the purposes and provisions of sections 18-2101 to 18-2144.

Laws 1951, c. 224, § 10(6), p. 813;

R.R.S.1943, § 14-1629;

R.R.S.1943, § 19-2629.